Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.123

Collectible vehicle.

"Collectible vehicle" means a vehicle that complies with the following:

(1) Is of unique or rare design, of limited production, and an object of curiosity;

(2) Is maintained primarily for use in car club activities, exhibitions, parades, or other functions of public interest or for a private collection, and is used only infrequently for other purposes; and

(3) Has collectible vehicle or classic automobile insurance coverage that restricts the collectible vehicle mileage or use, or both, and requires the owner to have another vehicle for personal use.

[ 2014 c 72 s 2.]